Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Chapter 2. Definitions; State Rehabilitation Council; Local Disability Services.

§§ 51.5-3 through 51.5-5.01.

Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 60.

Cross references.

For current definitions related to the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, see §

51.5-116

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, in enactment clauses 59 through 71, eliminated the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services, transferring powers and duties to the newly created Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services. For comparable sections see §

51.5-116

et seq. Where appropriate the historical references and case notes to former provisions have been transferred to the new provisions.

Former §

51.5-3

was also amended by Acts 2012, cc. 476 and 507. Pursuant to § 30-152, the Virginia Code Commission has directed that effect be given to that amendment in §

51.5-40.1

.

Former §

51.5-3

, pertaining to definitions, derived from Code 1950, §§ 2.1-574, 22-330.1, 22-330.4:1, 22-330.4:2; 1964, c. 276; 1978, c. 635; 1980, cc. 559, 728; 1982, c. 12; 1985, c. 421, § 51.01-3; 1988, c. 44; 1989, c. 181; 1993, c. 807; 1997, c. 801; 2003, cc. 57, 73. Former
§ 51.5-4, pertaining to creation of State Rehabilitation Council; purpose; membership, derived from Code 1950, §§ 2.1-575, 22-330.1; 1964, c. 276; 1978, c. 635; 1980, cc. 559, 728; 1985, c. 421, § 51.01-4; 1989, cc. 457, 489; 2003, cc. 57, 73. Former § 51.5-5, pertaining to powers and duties of Council, derived from Code 1950, §§ 2.1-576, 22-330.1:1; 1978, c. 635; 1980, c. 559; 1982, c. 12; 1984, c. 720; 1985, c. 421, § 51.01-5; 1992, c. 755; 2003, cc. 57, 73. Former § 51.5-5.01, pertaining to local interagency services teams, derives from 2011, cc. 41, 51.

§§ 51.5-5.1,
51.5-6.

Repealed by Acts 2003, cc. 57 and 73.

Cross references.

For current provisions regarding the establishment of regulations on human research, see §

51.5-132

.

§ 51.5-7.
Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 755.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1992, c. 755, cl. 5, which provided that the repeal of this section by Acts 1992, c. 755, would expire on July 1, 1994, was itself repealed by Acts 1994, c. 61, cl. 1. Therefore, the repeal of this section remains in effect.

Acts 1994, c. 61, cl. 2, provides that the repeal of Acts 1992, c. 755, cl. 5, by Acts 1994, c. 61, cl. 1, “shall apply only to the provisions of Chapter 755 of the Acts of Assembly of 1992 affecting the Department and the Board of Rehabilitative Services [now the State Rehabilitation Council].”